ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/myspell/eu-ES.aff
SFX X Y 120
SFX X  0      gatik          .
SFX X  0      gatiko          .
SFX X  0      tako          .
SFX X  0      k          .
SFX X  0      z          .
SFX X  0      zko          .
SFX X  0      ekin          .
SFX X  0      ekiko          .
SFX X  0      endako          .
SFX X  0      entzat          .
SFX X  0      entzako          .
SFX X  0      en          .
SFX X  0      ena          .
SFX X  0      enak          .
SFX X  0      enarekin          .
SFX X  0      enarendako          .
SFX X  0      enarentzat          .
SFX X  0      enari          .
SFX X  0      enaz          .
SFX X  0      enei          .
SFX X  0      enek          .
SFX X  0      enekin          .
SFX X  0      enendako          .
SFX X  0      enentzat          .
SFX X  0      enetaraino          .
SFX X  0      enetarantz          .
SFX X  0      enetarat          .
SFX X  0      enetara          .
SFX X  0      enetatik          .
SFX X  0      enetan          .
SFX X  0      enetarik          .
SFX X  0      enez          .
SFX X  0      engan          .
SFX X  0      engana          .
SFX X  0      enganaino          .
SFX X  0      enganantz          .
SFX X  0      engandik          .
SFX X  0      engatik          .
SFX X  0      enoi          .
SFX X  0      enok          .
SFX X  0      enokin          .
SFX X  0      enontzat          .
SFX X  0      enotaz          .
SFX X  0      enoz          .
SFX X  0      eni          .
SFX X  0      enik          .
SFX X  0      enean          .
SFX X  0      eneraino          .
SFX X  0      enerantz          .
SFX X  0      enerat          .
SFX X  0      enera          .
SFX X  0      enetik          .
SFX X  0      egatik          .
SFX X  0      i          .
SFX X  0      ko          .
SFX X  0      koa          .
SFX X  0      koago          .
SFX X  0      koak          .
SFX X  0      koarekin          .
SFX X  0      koarendako          .
SFX X  0      koarentzat          .
SFX X  0      koari          .
SFX X  0      koaz          .
SFX X  0      koegi          .
SFX X  0      koei          .
SFX X  0      koek          .
SFX X  0      koekin          .
SFX X  0      koendako          .
SFX X  0      koentzat          .
SFX X  0      koetaraino          .
SFX X  0      koetarantz          .
SFX X  0      koetarat          .
SFX X  0      koetara          .
SFX X  0      koetatik          .
SFX X  0      koetan          .
SFX X  0      koetarik          .
SFX X  0      koez          .
SFX X  0      kogatik          .
SFX X  0      kooi          .
SFX X  0      kook          .
SFX X  0      kookin          .
SFX X  0      koontzat          .
SFX X  0      kootaz          .
SFX X  0      kooz          .
SFX X  0      kotzat          .
SFX X  0      kok          .
SFX X  0      kotaraino          .
SFX X  0      kotarantz          .
SFX X  0      kotarat          .
SFX X  0      kotara          .
SFX X  0      kotatik          .
SFX X  0      kotan          .
SFX X  0      kotarik          .
SFX X  0      koz          .
SFX X  0      korekin          .
SFX X  0      korendako          .
SFX X  0      korentzat          .
SFX X  0      kori          .
SFX X  0      korik          .
SFX X  0      koan          .
SFX X  0      koraino          .
SFX X  0      korantz          .
SFX X  0      korat          .
SFX X  0      kora          .
SFX X  0      kotik          .
SFX X  0      raino          .
SFX X  0      rainoko          .
SFX X  0      rantz          .
SFX X  0      rantzago          .
SFX X  0      rantzegi          .
SFX X  0      ranzko          .
SFX X  0      rat          .
SFX X  0      rako          .
SFX X  0      ra          .
SFX X  0      rago          .
SFX X  0      tik          .
SFX X  0      tiko          .
SFX X  0      n          .
SFX X  0      ik          .
SFX X  0      iko          .
